Hawaii statutes.
§181-3 Prohibitions. (a) It shall be
unlawful for any person to engage in strip mining without first obtaining from
the board of land and natural resources a permit so to do, in the form
hereinafter provided.

(b) It shall be unlawful for any operator to
cause or permit any poisonous or noxious matter to be discharged into any
stream or shore water in such manner as to constitute a public nuisance. [L
1957, c 161, §4; am L 1959, c 20, §3; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §21; am L 1961, c
132, §2; Supp, §98C-4; HRS §181-3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next